src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON PATÆNNTA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ænnta with long and short compound-form. The -ennta form (used in "Ådå testamennta") is taged as sub (e always becomes æ in grade three).
          +Cmp/SgNom:ænnta%>    R                    ;
         +CmpNP/Pref:ent%>      R                    ;
                    :ænnta%>    N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
                    :ænnta%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
                    :ænnta»     DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
                    :ænnta»     DenominalAdjsV1      ;
                    :ænnta»     DenominalAdjsV2      ;
          +Cmp/SgGen:ænnta%>Q1  R                    ;
          +Cmp/PlGen:ænnta%>Q1j R                    ;
           +Err/Orth:enta       A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old patenta
 +Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:ennta%>    R                    ; ! makes old patennta
           +Err/Orth:ennta%>    N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ; ! makes old patennta
           +Err/Orth:ennta%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ; ! makes old patennta
           +Err/Orth:ennta»     DenominalNounsMUORRA ; ! makes old patennta
           +Err/Orth:ennta»     DenominalAdjsV1      ; ! makes old patennta
           +Err/Orth:ennta»     DenominalAdjsV2      ; ! makes old patennta
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:ennta%>Q1  R                    ; ! makes old patennta
 +Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:ennta%>Q1j R                    ; ! makes old patennta

!!€gt-norm: patænnta # Even-syllable test
!!€ patænnta:                 patænnta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ patännta:                 patænnta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ patentas:                 patænnta+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON VARIÁNNTA
 +N+OLang/NOB: VARIÁNNTA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON VARIÁNNTA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ánnta with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.
  +Cmp/SgNom:ánnta%>   R                    ;
 +CmpNP/Pref:ant%>     R                    ;
            :ánnta%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
            :ánnta%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
            :ánnta»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
            :ánnta»    DenominalAdjsV1      ;
            :ánnta»    DenominalAdjsV2      ;
  +Cmp/SgGen:ánta%>    R                    ;
  +Cmp/PlGen:ánta%>j   R                    ;
   +Err/Orth:ant       A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old varianta


!!€gt-norm: praktikánnta # Even-syllable test
!!€ praktikánnta:                 praktikánnta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ praktikántas:                 praktikánnta+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON KOLLÆKTA
 +N+OLang/NOB: KOLLÆKTA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON KOLLÆKTA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ækta with long and short compound-form
  +Cmp/SgNom:ækta%>    R                    ;
 +CmpNP/Pref:ekt%>     R                    ;
            :ækta%>    N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
            :ækta%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
            :ækta»     DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
            :ækta»     DenominalAdjsV1      ;
            :ækta»     DenominalAdjsV2      ;
  +Cmp/SgGen:ækta%>Q1  R                    ;
  +Cmp/PlGen:ækta%>Q1j R                    ;
   +Err/Orth:ekt       A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old kollekta

!!€gt-norm: subjækta # Even-syllable test
!!€ subjækta:                 subjækta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ subjäkta:                 subjækta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ subjevtas:                 subjækta+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON TURISSTA
 +N+OLang/NOB: TURISSTA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON TURISSTA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ssta with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.
  +Cmp/SgNom:ssta%>   R                    ;
 +CmpNP/Pref:st9%>    R                    ;
            :ssta%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
            :ssta%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
            :ssta»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
            :ssta»    DenominalAdjsV1      ;
            :ssta»    DenominalAdjsV2      ;
  +Cmp/SgGen:sta%>    R                    ;
  +Cmp/PlGen:sta%>j   R                    ;
   +Err/Orth:st       A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old turista

!!€gt-norm: journalissta # Even-syllable test
!!€ journalissta:                 journalissta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ journalistas:                 journalissta+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON ADJEKTIJVVA
 +N+OLang/NOB: ADJEKTIJVVA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON ADJEKTIJVVA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ijvva with long and short compound-form
  +Cmp/SgNom:ijvva%>   R                    ;
 +CmpNP/Pref:iv%>      R                    ;
        +Attr:ijvva%> K     ;
            :ijvva%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
            :ijvva%>Q1 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
            :ijvva»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
            :ijvva»    DenominalAdjsV1      ;
            :ijvva»    DenominalAdjsV2      ;
  +Cmp/SgGen:ijva%>    R                    ;
  +Cmp/PlGen:ijva%>j   R                    ;
   +Err/Orth:iv        A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old adjektiva


!!€gt-norm: datijvva # Even-syllable test
!!€ datijvva:                 datijvva+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ datijvas:                 datijvva+N+Sg+Ela

!! !Loanwords becoming odd-syll
! - - - - - -

LEXICON PRIEMIJ
 +N+OLang/NOB: PRIEMIJ_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON PRIEMIJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Assimilated loanwords. on -ie/-y, like premie and bandy. Become odd syllable loan words with cg, like "riebij". Nom: premij, gen prebmiha. Long and short essive.
    +Sg+Nom:j%>Q1 K                 ;
       +Ess:n%>Q1 K                 ; !Short
       +Ess:hin%> K                 ; !Long
           :h%>   OTH-ODDCASE       ;
           :h»    DenominalNounsODD ;
           :h»    DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           :h%>   ODDCmp            ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:j%>Q1 R                 ;
           :h%>   AHTÁ              ;

!!€gt-norm: priemij # Even-syllable test
!!€ priemij:                  priemij+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ premij:                  priemij+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ priebmihis:               priemij+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ prebmihis:               priemij+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ priemin:                  priemij+N+Ess
!!€ premin:                  priemij+N+Ess
!!€ priebmihin:               priemij+N+Ess
!!€ prebmihin:               priemij+N+Ess




!! ! Badly assimilated loanwords
! - - - - - -

LEXICON NOADE_BADASS
 +N+OLang/NOB+Use/NotDNorm: NOADE_BADASS_CMP_INFL ; ! 5.9.2019: EJP/SNM: fjerna +Use/-Spell - sjølv om vi ikkje likar orda, så vil vi sjå til at dei blir skrive rett etter smj-ortografien! Dei fleste orda er uansett merka med +Err/Orth :)

LEXICON NOADE_BADASS_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ 2 syll stems without cg. Badly or wrongly assimilated words, ie. assimilated in a way that isn't lulesami. Most of the words are Err/Orth tagged with a standardized lemma. Some are Err/Lex tagged, ("and some only recieve the +Use/-Spell tag from the lexicon" -this we removed 5.9.19!)
 :%>   N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
 :%>Q4 N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
 :»    DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
 :»    DenominalAdjsV1      ;
 :»Y7  DenominalAdjsV2      ;
 :%>   NOADECmp             ;

!!€gt-norm:  # Even-syllable test
!!€                  +N+Sg+Nom
!!€                +N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON BOAKSA_BADASS
 +N+OLang/NOB+Use/NotDNorm+Err/Orth: BOAKSA_BADASS_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON BOAKSA_BADASS_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ This is an Err/Sub, and all the words pointing to lexicon BOAKSA are therfore Err/Sub taged. Only for words "boaksa-båksav". Boaksa-båksa is assimilated wrongly, must be boaksa-båvsa if it's to follow lulesami rules.
           :oaksa%>    N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
           :åkºsa%>Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ; ! Weak grade Q1 !WRONG
           :åkºsa»     DenominalNounsMUORRA ; !WRONG
           :åkºsa»     DenominalAdjsV1      ; !WRONG
!         :åkºsa»     DenominalAdjsV2      ; not plausible
 +Cmp/SgNom:oaksa%>    R                    ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:åkºsa%>Q1  R                    ; !WRONG
 +Cmp/PlGen:åkºsa%>Q1j R                    ; !WRONG

LEXICON GAHPER_BADASS !
 +N+OLang/NOB+Use/NotDNorm+Use/-Spell: GAHPER_BADASS_CMP_INFL ;
