src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx
akkusatijvva+Sem/Cat:akkusat ADJEKTIJVVA "accusative N" ; ! GG 
antikrissta+v2+Sem/Hum:anti#kri TURISSTA ; ! 
aspækta+Sem/Prod-ling:a^sp KOLLÆKTA ;
avtadássásasjvuodaperspektijvva+Sem/Semcon:avta#dássásasjvuoda#per^spekt ADJEKTIJVVA ;
baktierij+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/State-sick_Substnc:bakterri PRIEMIJ ; ! 
bandij+Sem/Sport:banndi PRIEMIJ ;
baptissta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:bapti TURISSTA ;
blyánnta+Sem/Tool-write:bly VARIÁNNTA ;
boaksa+v2+Sem/Ctain:b BOAKSA_BADASS ; ! Err/Orth taged lexicon
breijlla+Err/Orth+Sem/Sign:braill NOADE_BADASS ; ! Braille=punkskrift
dialækta+Sem/Lang:dial KOLLÆKTA ; ! 
diminutijvva+Err/Orth+Sem/Cat:deminut ADJEKTIJVVA ; ! 
dåhkkåteáhtar+Err/Orth+Sem/Event:dåhkkåte^áhter GAHPER_BADASS ; ! 
effækta+Sem/State:eff KOLLÆKTA ;
eksiempel+Err/Orth+Sem/Semcon:eksempel NOADE_BADASS ; ! Err/Lex eksempel - buojkulvis
eksorsissta+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:exorsi TURISSTA ;
ekspressijvva+Sem/Feat-psych:eks^press ADJEKTIJVVA ; ! GG
evangelissta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:evangeli TURISSTA ;
fierij+Area/NO+Sem/Time:fierri PRIEMIJ ;
fierij+Area/SE+Sem/Time:ferri PRIEMIJ ;
fokuspartisipánnta+Sem/Hum:fokus#partisip VARIÁNNTA ;
fortuitijvva+Sem/Cat:fortu^it ADJEKTIJVVA ;
generalløytnánnta+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:general#leutn VARIÁNNTA ;
gitarissta+Area/NO+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gitari TURISSTA ;
gráffa+Err/Orth+Sem/Dir_Geom:gráfa NOADE_BADASS ; ! 
gummij+Sem/Mat:gumºmi PRIEMIJ ;
gámmár+Sem/Buildpart_Plc:gámmár GAHPER_BADASS ; ! 
håhkij+Sem/Sport:håhkki PRIEMIJ ;
idiolækta+Sem/Cat:idiol KOLLÆKTA ;
iemeálmmukperspektijvva+Sem/Semcon:ieme#álmmuk#per^spekt ADJEKTIJVVA ;
inkásoj+Err/Orth+Sem/Txt:inkásso NOADE_BADASS ;
insækta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:ins KOLLÆKTA ; ! 
juvrij+Sem/Group:juvrri PRIEMIJ ;
kanslissta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:kansli TURISSTA ;
klubba+Err/Orth+Sem/Org:club GAHPER_BADASS ; ! LOAN 
knækta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:kn KOLLÆKTA ;
kollektijvva+Sem/State_Veh:kollekt ADJEKTIJVVA ;
kollækta+Sem/Act:koll KOLLÆKTA ; ! 
komiedij+Area/NO+Sem/Prod:komiehti PRIEMIJ ; ! From NOR komedie
kommandánnta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:kommand VARIÁNNTA ;
kommándoj+Err/Orth+Sem/Prod-ling:kommándo NOADE_BADASS ;
kontinuánnta+Sem/Dummytag:kontinu^ VARIÁNNTA ;
logopehta+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:logopeda NOADE_BADASS ; ! 
makedonak+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:makedonag9 GAHPER_BADASS ;
minimalissta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:minimali TURISSTA ;
multiplikatijvva+Sem/Cat:multi^plikat ADJEKTIJVVA ;
mándal+Err/Orth+Sem/Food:mánndel GAHPER_BADASS ;
oberstløytnánnta+Area/NO+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:oberst9#lø9ytn VARIÁNNTA ;
objækta+Sem/Cat_Obj:obj KOLLÆKTA ;
pensjonissta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:pensjoni TURISSTA ; ! GG
poahppa+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:pop GAHPER_BADASS ;
poasstaboaksa+Err/Orth+Sem/Ctain:poassta#b BOAKSA_BADASS ; ! Err/Orth taged lexicon
praktikánnta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:praktik VARIÁNNTA ;
priemij+Area/SE+Sem/Obj:prebmi PRIEMIJ ;
privatijvva+Sem/State:privat ADJEKTIJVVA ; ! 
renræjssa+Err/Orth+Sem/Act:ren^rac NOADE_BADASS ;
respækta+Sem/Feat:re^sp KOLLÆKTA ;
sekstánnta+Sem/Dummytag:sekst VARIÁNNTA ; ! GG
sextánnta+Area/SE+Sem/Dummytag:sext VARIÁNNTA ;
siehkil+Err/Orth+Sem/Time:sekel GAHPER_BADASS ; ! 
sierij+Area/SE+Sem/Sport:serri PRIEMIJ ;
slaloamma+Err/Orth+Sem/Act:slálom GAHPER_BADASS ;
sociolingvissta+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:socio^lingvi TURISSTA ;
sosiolækta+Sem/Lang:sosiol KOLLÆKTA ; ! GG 
stoika+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sto^ika NOADE_BADASS ; ! What is this?
stylissta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:styli TURISSTA ;
subjæktaoblikutijvva+Sem/Cat:subjækta#oblikut ADJEKTIJVVA ;
sámpal+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag:sampel GAHPER_BADASS ; !
vuollesergeánnta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:vuolle#serge VARIÁNNTA ;
æhppa+Err/Orth+Sem/Prod-vis:appa NOADE_BADASS ; ! 
